Utah statutes.
63A-3-304.   Effect of nonpayment or failure to respond.

If a written response or payment of delinquent receivable is not received by the state within 15 days from the date of receipt of the notice by the debtor, the debtor is in default and the state may determine the balance due and collect the balance as provided in Section 63A-3-307.

